vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Các môn thi đấu trong nhà: Khúc côn cầu bàn; Bi-a; Bowling; Cờ búng Carrom; Cờ búng Crokinole; Bi lắc; Bàn trò chơi đa năng; Bóng bàn; Trò chơi ném vòng và móc câu; Thiết bị mô phỏng đua xe; Trò chơi đẩy đĩa; Bi đá trên bàn; Ném phi tiêu
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Kambario žaidimai: Oro ritulys; Biliardas; Boulingas; Karomas; Krokinolis; Stalo futbolas; Kelių žaidimų stalai; Stalo tenisas; Žiedų mėtymo ir kabliuko žaidimai; Simuliatorių lenktynių įranga; Stalo slydinys; Stalo kerlingas; Smiginio strėlytės
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Jogos internos: Hóquei aéreo; Bilhar; Boliche; Carrom; Crokinole; Pebolim; Mesas de jogo; Pingue-pongue; Jogos de argolas e ganchos; Equipamentos de sim racing; Mesa de shuffleboard; Curling de mesa; Jogos de dardos
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > İç Mekan Sporları: Hava Hokeyi; Bilardo; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Langırt; Çoklu Oyun Masaları; Pinpon; Halka atma ve kanca oyunları; Simülasyon yarış ekipmanları; Table Shuffleboard; Masa üstü körling; Fırlatma Dartları
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Igre v zaprtih prostorih: Zračni hokej; Biljard; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Namizni nogomet; Večnamenske igralne mize; Namizni tenis; Met obroča na kavelj; Oprema za simulacijo dirkanja; Namizni shuffleboard; Namizni curling; Pikado
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 室内游戏: 空气曲棍球; 台球用品; 保龄球用品; 卡罗姆; 克罗基诺; 桌上足球; 多功能娱乐游戏桌; 乒乓球用品; 套圈与钩环游戏; 模拟赛车设备; 沙狐球; 桌上冰壶; 飞镖
ko: 스포츠용품 > 실내용 게임: 에어 하키; 당구; 볼링; 카롬; 크로키놀; 푸스볼; 멀티 게임 테이블; 탁구; 링 토스 및 훅 게임; 심 레이싱 장비; 테이블 셔플보드; 탁상용 컬링; 다트 던지기
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Jocuri de interior: Air hockey; Biliard; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Fusbal; Mese pentru jocuri multiple; Ping-pong; Jocuri de aruncat inele și cârlige; Echipament de curse simulate; Shuffleboard de masă; Curling de masă; Darts
nl: Sportartikelen > Binnenspelletjes: Air hockey; Biljart; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Tafelvoetbal; Multispeeltafels; Pingpong; Ringwerp- en haakspellen; Sim-race-uitrusting; Tafelshuffleboard; Tafelcurling; Dartpijlen
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Indoorové aktivity: Stolní hokej; Kulečník; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Stolní fotbal; Herní stolky; Ping pong; Hry s házením kroužků; Vybavení pro sim racing; Stolní shuffleboard; Stolní curling; Šipky
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Igre u zatvorenom: Stolni hokej; Biljar; Kuglanje; Carrom; Crokinole; Stolni nogomet; Stolovi za više igara; Ping pong; Igre s bacanjem prstena i udice; Oprema za simulaciju utrka; Stolni Shuffleboard; Stolni curling; Pikado
hu: Sportszerek > Beltéri játékok: Léghoki; Biliárd; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Csocsó; Többjátékos asztalok; Asztalitenisz; Karikadobó és horgos játékok; Verseny-szimulátor felszerelések; Asztali shuffleboard; Asztali curling; Dobó Darts
ja: スポーツ用品 > 室内競技・室内ゲーム: エアホッケー用品; ビリヤード用品; ボウリング; キャロム; クロキノール; フーズボール; マルチゲームテーブル; 卓球; 輪投げ・フックゲーム; シムレーシング機材; テーブルシャッフルボード; 卓上カーリング; ダーツ用品
de: Sportartikel > Indoor - Aktivitäten: Air-Hockey; Billard; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Tischfußball; Multispieltische; Tischtennis; Ringwurf- & Hakenspiele; Sim-Racing-Ausrüstung; Jakkolo; Tischcurling; Dartspiele
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室內運動: 空氣曲棍球; 撞球; 保齡球; 康樂棋; 克羅基諾; 手足球; 變換式遊戲桌; 桌球; 套圈圈與掛勾遊戲; 模擬賽車設備; 沙弧球; 桌上冰壺; 飛鏢
nb: Sportsutstyr > Innendørsspill: Lufthockey; Biljard; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Foosball; Flerspillbord; Bordtennis; Ringkast og krokspill; Simracing-utstyr; Shuffleboard; Bordcurling; Kastepiler
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Jogos em interior: Hóquei de ar; Bilhares; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Matraquilhos; Mesas multi-jogos; Pingue Pongue; Jogos de argolas e ganchos; Equipamento de sim racing; Shuffleboard de mesa; Curling de mesa; Dardos de interior
en: Sporting Goods > Indoor Games: Air Hockey; Billiards; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Foosball; Multi-Game Tables; Ping Pong; Ring Toss & Hook Games; Sim Racing Equipment; Table Shuffleboard; Tabletop Curling; Throwing Darts
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > เกมในร่ม: แอร์ฮอกกี้; บิลเลียด; โบว์ลิ่ง; คาร์รอม; โครคิโนล; ฟุสบอล; โต๊ะสำหรับหลายเกม; ปิงปอง; เกมโยนห่วงและเกี่ยวตะขอ; อุปกรณ์ซิมเรซซิ่ง; ชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด; เคอร์ลิงตั้งโต๊ะ; การปาลูกดอก
fr: Équipements sportifs > Jeux d’intérieur: Air Hockey; Billard; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Baby-foot; Tables multi-jeux; Ping Pong; Jeux de lancer d’anneaux et anneaux à crochet; Équipement de simulation de course; Shuffleboard de table; Curling de table; Jeux de fléchettes
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Игри на закрито: Въздушен хокей; Билярд; Боулинг; Керъм; Крокинол; Футбол на маса; Комбинирани игрални маси; Пинг-понг; Игри „Кука и халка“; Оборудване за симулационни състезания; Шафълборд на маса; Кърлинг на маса; Дартс
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Interiérové hry: Vzdušný hokej; Biliard; Bowling; Carrom; Krokinole; Stolný futbal; Multifunkčné herné stoly; Stolný tenis; Hry s hádzaním krúžkov a háčikov; Vybavenie pre simulované preteky; Stolný shuffleboard; Stolový curling; Hádzanie šípok
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Παιχνίδια εσωτερικού χώρου: Χόκεϊ αέρος; Μπιλιάρδο; Μπόουλινγκ; Carrom; Crokinole; Ποδοσφαιράκι; Πολυτραπέζια παιχνιδιών; Πινγκ πονγκ; Παιχνίδια ρίψης κρίκων; Εξοπλισμός sim racing; Επιτραπέζιο shuffleboard; Επιτραπέζιο κέρλινγκ; Ρίψη βελών
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Sisäpelit: Ilmakiekko; Biljardi; Keilailu; Carrom; Crokinole; Pöytäfutis; Monipelipöydät; Pingis; Renkaanheitto- ja koukkupelit; Sim Racing -varusteet; Shuffleboard; Pöytäcurling; Dartsinheitto
sv: Sportartiklar > Inomhussporter: Air hockey; Biljard; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Bordsfotboll; Bord för flera spel; Bordtennis; Ringspel och krokspel; Utrustning för simracing; Bordsshuffleboard; Bordscurling; Dart
ru: Спортивные товары > Игры в помещении: Аэрохоккей; Бильярд; Боулинг; Карром; Крокинол; Настольный футбол; Игровые столы-трансформеры; Настольный теннис; Кольцебросы и игры с крючком; Оборудование для симрейсинга; Настольный шаффлборд; Настольный керлинг; Дартс
it: Articoli sportivi > Giochi indoor: Air hockey; Biliardi; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Biliardino; Tavoli multi-gioco; Ping pong; Giochi del lancio degli anelli; Attrezzatura per sim racing; Tavolo da shuffleboard; Curling da tavolo; Freccette da lancio
da: Sportsartikler > Indendørsspil: Airhockey; Billard; Bowling; Carrom; Crokinole; Bordfodbold; Multispilleborde; Bordtennis; Ringkast og krogspil; Udstyr til sim-racing; Shuffleboard til bord; Bordcurling; Dart
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Juegos de interior: Hockey de mesa; Billar; Bolos; Carrom; Crokinole; Futbolín; Mesas multijuegos; Ping pong; Juegos de lanzamiento de aros y ganchos; Equipamiento de sim racing; Tejos de mesa; Curling de mesa; Dardos
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Gry towarzyskie: Air hockey; Bilard; Kręglarstwo; Karambol; Crokinole; Piłkarzyki; Stoły do wielu gier; Tenis stołowy; Gry typu ring toss i rzut do celu; Sprzęt do simracingu; Shuffleboard stołowy; Curling stołowy; Gra w rzutki